Illinois, session 104th, HB1367.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Sections 115-5, 115-55, 115-90, and 115-95 and by adding 6Section 115-97 as follows: 7    (60 ILCS 1/115-5)8    Sec. 115-5. Definitions. As used in this Article, unless 9the context otherwise requires:10    "Board" means the township board in counties having a 11population of more than 150,000.12    "Development of real property" means the constructing, 13installing, planting or creating of any permanent or temporary 14improvement of real property that has been acquired for open 15space purposes.16    "Open land" or "open space" means any space or area of land 17or water of an area of 12 50 acres or more, the preservation or 18the restriction of development or use of which would (i) 19maintain or enhance the conservation of natural or scenic 20resources; (ii) protect natural streams or water supply; (iii) 21promote conservation of soils, wet lands, or shores; (iv) 22afford or enhance public outdoor recreation opportunities; (v) 23preserve flora and fauna, geological features, historic sites,   HB1367 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1or other areas of educational or scientific interest; (vi) 2enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring 3highways, parks, or other public lands; (vii) implement the 4plan of development adopted by the planning commission of any 5municipality or county; or (viii) promote orderly urban or 6suburban development. A township at any time may release a 7specified parcel of land from an open space plan and allow the 8development of the parcel to occur. Once development (as 9defined in Section 115-55) has commenced, the land shall no 10longer be eligible for acquisition as open space or open land.11    "Open space plan" means the written plan adopted by the 12board to implement an open space program and includes properly 13adopted amendments or additions to the plan.14    "Open space program" means the acquisition of the fee or 15of a lesser right or interest in tracts of open land in the 16township for open space purposes.17    "Open space purposes" includes (i) the preservation and 18maintenance of open land, scenic roadways, and pathways; (ii) 19the holding of real property described in clause (i), with or 20without public access, for the education, pleasure, and 21recreation of the public or for other open space values; (iii) 22the preservation of portions of that property in their natural 23condition and the development of other portions of that 24property, including development for agricultural purposes; 25(iv) the management and use of that property in a manner and 26with restrictions that will leave it unimpaired for the   HB1367 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1benefit of future generations; and (v) otherwise promoting the 2conservation of the nature, flora and fauna, natural 3environment, and natural resources of the township.4(Source: P.A. 91-641, eff. 8-20-99.) 5    (60 ILCS 1/115-55)6    Sec. 115-55. Acquisition of open land. 7    (a) The board may acquire by gift, legacy, purchase, 8condemnation in the manner provided for the exercise of the 9right of eminent domain under the Eminent Domain Act and 10except as otherwise provided in this subsection, lease, 11agreement, or otherwise the fee or any lesser right or 12interest in real property that is open land and may hold that 13property with or without public access for open space, scenic 14roadway, pathway, outdoor recreation, or other conservation 15benefits. No township in a county having a population of more 16than 150,000 but not more than 250,000 has authority under 17this Article to acquire property by condemnation, and no other 18township has authority under this Article to acquire by 19condemnation (i) property that is used for farming or 20agricultural purposes; (ii) property that is situated within 21the corporate limits of a municipality or contiguous to one or 22more municipalities unless approval to acquire the property by 23condemnation is obtained under Section 115-30 or 115-35; (iii) 24property upon which development has commenced; or (iv) 25property owned by a religious organization, church, school, or   HB1367 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1charitable organization exempt from federal taxation under 2Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or 3similar provisions of any successor law, or any other 4organization controlled by or affiliated with such a religious 5organization, church, school, or charitable organization. 6    (a-5) Open land acquired in fee for an open space plan by a 7township must be held by the township, unless leased or 8disposed of as provided in Sections 115-90, 115-95, and 9115-97, and used by the township or lessee for open space 10purposes. 11    (b) For purposes of this Section: 12        (1)  "Development" of property is deemed to have 13    commenced if (i) at least 30 days before the filing of a 14    petition under Section 115-10, an application for a 15    preliminary plan or preliminary planned unit development 16    has been filed with the applicable governmental entity or, 17    if neither is required, a building permit has been 18    obtained at least 30 days before the filing of a petition 19    under Section 115-10; (ii) mass grading of the property 20    has commenced; and (iii) within 180 days of the date the 21    open space plan is recommended for approval by the board 22    under Section 115-5 or by petition of the voters under 23    Section 115-20, 115-30, or 115-35, the installation of 24    public improvements has commenced. 25        (2) "Contiguous" means contiguous for purposes of 26    annexation under Article 7 of the Illinois Municipal Code.   HB1367 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1        (3) Real property is deemed used for farming or 2    agricultural purposes if it is more than 10 acres in area 3    and devoted primarily to (i) the raising and harvesting of 4    crops, (ii) the feeding, breeding, and management of 5    livestock, (iii) dairying, or (iv) any other agricultural 6    or horticultural use or combination of those uses, with 7    the intention of securing substantial income from those 8    activities, and has been so used for the 3 years 9    immediately preceding the filing of a condemnation action. 10    Real property used for farming or agricultural purposes 11    includes land devoted to and qualifying for payments or 12    other compensation under a soil conservation program under 13    an agreement with an agency of the federal government and 14    also includes the construction and use of dwellings and 15    other buildings customarily associated with farming and 16    agricultural uses when associated with those uses.17    (c) If a township's acquisitions of open land, or 18interests in open land when combined with other lands in the 19township held for open space purposes by other governmental 20entities, equals 30% of the total acreage of the township, 21then the township may not acquire additional open land by 22condemnation.23    (d) Any parcel of land that is included in an open space 24plan adopted by a township that has not been acquired by the 25township under this Section within 3 years, or within 2 years 26with respect to existing open space programs, after the later   HB1367 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1of (i) July 29, 1988, or (ii) the date of the passage of the 2referendum may not thereafter be acquired by condemnation by 3the township under this Section, except that if an action in 4condemnation to acquire the parcel is filed under this Section 5within that 3 year or 2 year period, as applicable, the parcel 6may be acquired by condemnation by the township 7notwithstanding the fact that the condemnation action may not 8be concluded within the 3 year or 2 year period, as applicable. 9Notwithstanding the foregoing, if a parcel of land cannot be 10acquired by condemnation under subsection (a) because of its 11use for farming or agricultural purposes, the 3 year or 2 year 12period, as applicable, shall be tolled until the date the 13parcel ceases to be used for farming or agricultural purposes. 14Notwithstanding the foregoing, the fee or any lesser right or 15interest in real property that is open land may be acquired 16after the 3 year or 2 year period, as applicable, by any means 17authorized under subsection (a) other than condemnation.18(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.) 19    (60 ILCS 1/115-90)20    Sec. 115-90. Lease of lands. 21    (a) Before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 22the 104th General Assembly, the The board may lease land for a 23period not longer than 50 years from the date of the lease to a 24responsible person, firm, or corporation for construction, 25reconstruction, alteration, renewal, equipment, furnishing,   HB1367 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1extension, development, operation and maintenance of lodges, 2housekeeping and sleeping cabins, swimming pools, golf 3courses, campgrounds, sand beaches, marinas, convention and 4entertainment centers, roads and parking areas, and other 5related buildings and facilities. In any lease of land leased 6under this subsection Section, upon expiration of the lease 7title to all structures on the leased land shall be vested in 8the township.9    (b) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 10of the 104th General Assembly, the board may lease open space 11that is a part of the township's open space program for a 12period not longer than 25 years from the date of the lease to 13an individual, a nonprofit organization, the federal 14government, a state government, or a local government for 15construction, reconstruction, alteration, renewal, equipment, 16furnishing, extension, development, operation, housekeeping, 17and maintenance of lodges, sleeping cabins, swimming pools, 18golf courses, campgrounds, sand beaches, marinas, agricultural 19properties, roads and parking areas, and other related 20buildings and facilities consistent with open space purposes. 21Upon expiration of a lease of land under this subsection, 22title to all structures on the leased land shall be vested in 23the township. Nothing in this subsection prohibits open space 24that is a part of the township's open space program from being 25used in accordance with this Article for agricultural 26purposes. The changes made to this Section by this amendatory   HB1367 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly do not affect any lease 2entered into on or before the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 4(Source: P.A. 88-670, eff. 12-2-94.) 5    (60 ILCS 1/115-95)6    Sec. 115-95. Lease of buildings or facilities. The board 7may lease to an individual, a nonprofit organization, the 8federal government, a state government, or a local government 9any building or facility constructed, reconstructed, altered, 10renewed, equipped, furnished, extended, developed, and 11maintained by the township on open space that is a part of the 12township's open space program to a responsible person, firm, 13or corporation for operation or development, or both, and 14maintenance for a period not longer than 20 years from the date 15of the lease. Nothing in this Section prohibits open space 16that is a part of the township's open space program from being 17used in accordance with this Article for agricultural 18purposes. The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 19Act of the 104th General Assembly do not affect any lease 20entered into on or before the effective date of this 21amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.22(Source: P.A. 88-670, eff. 12-2-94.) 23    (60 ILCS 1/115-97 new)24    Sec. 115-97. Disposition of open space.  HB1367 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1    (a) A township board may not sell, convey, donate, or 2otherwise dispose of any part of open space without referendum 3approval by the majority of the voters of the township voting 4on the question at a regular election. The board may certify 5the question of disposition of property to the appropriate 6election authority only if the board approves the question by 7at least a two-thirds majority of the board members. The 8referendum shall be conducted consistent with the referendum 9procedures under Section 115-20. However, the township board 10may, without a referendum, sell, convey, or donate any part of 11the open space to the Department of Transportation if:12        (1) the conveyance is for road purposes; 13        (2) the Department of Transportation and the township 14    board hold at least one public hearing at which citizens 15    may review plans for the open space and provide public 16    comment. Notice of the public hearing shall be given at 17    least 20 days prior to the hearing and at least 30 days 18    prior to a vote by the township board. The notice shall be 19    given by public advertisement in a newspaper of general 20    circulation in the township and must also be sent to the 21    Governor and to each member of the General Assembly whose 22    district overlaps in whole or in part the open space 23    district; and24        (3) the conveyance is approved by a two-thirds 25    majority vote of the township board members.26    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a   HB1367 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06216 RTM 16251 b1township dissolves or is consolidated or merged or the 2boundaries of the township are altered, any open space 3affected by that action shall continue to be used for open 4space purposes unless (i) the open space is disposed of using 5the same procedures required under subsection (a) by the board 6of the unit of local government in control of that open space 7or (ii) the open space is sold, conveyed, or donated to a 8nonprofit organization, the federal government, a state 9government, or a local government to be used for open space 10purposes.